Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1584.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; state department of corrections; recruitment and training The sum of $1,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the state department of corrections for recruitment and training.